Montana, session 2025, HB808.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Short title. [Sections 1 through 8] may be cited as the "Montana Brownfields
Revitalization Act".
Section 2. Findings and intent -- purposes. The legislature finds that:
(1) real properties exist across the state where the stigma of hazardous substance and petroleum
contamination hinders the development or best use of the property. These properties may be eligible for
brownfields funding.
(2) the assessment and cleanup of hazardous substance and petroleum brownfields sites should
be encouraged and facilitated to reduce threats to human health and the environment, prepare properties for
reuse and redevelopment, and return property to the local tax rolls;
(3) the petroleum tank release cleanup fund established in 75-11-313 does not immediately
address all petroleum tank release sites in Montana;
(4) not all sites impacted by hazardous substances are assessed or cleaned up by the
Comprehensive Environmental Cleanup and Responsibility Act in chapter 10, part 7, of this title or the federal
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 808
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 808
Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, 42 U.S.C. 9601, et seq.
Section 3. Definitions. (1) The definitions used in [sections 1 through 8] are for the purpose of
determining the eligibility of sites to receive and expend federal brownfields funding received by a grant
recipient from the United States environmental protection agency under the federal Brownfields Revitalization
and Environmental Restoration Act of 2001, Title II of Public Law 107-118.
(2) As used in [ sections 1 through 8] unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the following
definitions apply:
(a) "Brownfield site" means an abandoned, idle, blighted, or underutilized property, for which the
expansion, redevelopment, or reuse of may be complicated by the presence or potential presence of hazardous
substances, pollutants, or contaminants.
(b) "Brownfields redevelopment" means any work or undertaking by a person to acquire a
brownfield site and to raze, demolish, remove, reconstruct, renovate, or rehabilitate the site or existing
buildings, structures, or other improvements at the site for the purpose of promoting the use of the site for
residential, commercial, industrial, or other purposes. The term does not include construction of new facilities
on the site for any purpose other than environmental remediation activities.
(c) "Department" means the department of environmental quality provided for in 2-15-3501.
(d) "Eligible entity" means a city, town, county, consolidated city-county, tribal government,
economic development organization, nonprofit organization, or state agency that has received federal
brownfields funding from the environmental protection agency or other state agency.
(e) "Environmental remediation activities" means:
(i) investigation, analysis, and monitoring of a brownfields site to determine the existence and
extent of actual or potential environmental pollution;
(ii) redevelopment planning; or
(iii) abatement, removal, or containment of environmental pollution at a brownfields site.
(f) "Hazardous substance" has the same meaning as provided in 75-10-602.
(g) "Petroleum" or "petroleum product" has the same meaning as provided in 75-11-302.
(h) "Petroleum tank release site" means a site where there has been a release from a petroleum
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 808
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 808
storage tank and assessment or remediation, or both, are being pursued in accordance with Title 75, chapter
11, part 3.
(i) "Reasonable steps" means, as appropriate, stopping continuing releases, preventing
threatened future releases, or preventing or limiting human, environmental, or natural resource exposure to
previous petroleum, petroleum product, or hazardous substance releases. The term may include limiting access
to the property, monitoring known contaminants, and complying with state, local, or both state and local
requirements.
(j) "Responsible party" means:
(i) a person responsible for conducting the assessment, investigation, and cleanup at a brownfield
site as determined through:
(A) a judgment rendered in a court of law or an administrative order;
(B) an enforcement action by federal authorities or the department; or
(C) a citizen suit, contribution action, or other third-party claim brought against the current owner of
a brownfield site; or
(ii) a current owner of a brownfield site who:
(A) dispensed or disposed of petroleum or petroleum product or hazardous substance
contamination at the site;
(B) exacerbated existing contamination at the site;
(C) owned the site when any dispensing or disposal of petroleum or hazardous substances by
others took place; or
(D) failed to take reasonable steps with regard to contamination at the site.
(k) "Viable responsible party" means a responsible party determined by the department to have
the financial capability to conduct environmental remediation activities at a brownfield site.
Section 4. Viability at a petroleum release site. (1) For the purpose of determining the viability of a
responsible party at a brownfield site where petroleum contamination is the predominant contaminant, the
department shall presume that:
(a) ongoing businesses or companies and government entities are viable unless there is
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 808
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 808
information suggesting that the presumption is not appropriate, and the department determines the information
is sufficient to rebut the presumption in a particular case; and
(b) individuals and defunct or insolvent companies are not viable unless there is information
suggesting that the presumption is not appropriate, and the department determines the information is sufficient
to rebut the presumption in a particular case.
(2) The department may not determine that a responsible party is viable based solely on the fact
that the owner or operator of a petroleum tank release site is eligible to be reimbursed by the petroleum tank
release compensation board established in 2-15-2108 from the petroleum tank release cleanup fund
established in 75-11-313.
(3) It is an applicant's responsibility to provide the department with sufficient financial information
about a responsible party identified in a petroleum brownfields site eligibility application to determine whether
the responsible party is a viable responsible party.
Section 5. Eligibility for brownfields funding -- determination and limitations. (1) Before an
eligible entity may expend federal brownfields funds at a brownfield site, either the United States environmental
protection agency or the department shall make a written determination that:
(a) there is no viable responsible party for the contamination as determined pursuant to [section 4];
(b) the brownfield site will not be assessed, investigated, or cleaned up by a responsible party; and
(c) the brownfield site is not subject to an order under section 9003(h) of the federal Solid Waste
Disposal Act, 42 U.S.C. 6991b(h), or Title 75, chapter 11.
(2) After the department or the United States environmental protection agency determines that a
brownfield site is eligible for federal brownfields funding, the department shall encourage and may not limit the
use of an eligible entity’s federal brownfields funding at the site even if the site owner or operator, as defined in
75-11-302, is eligible for funding from the petroleum tank release cleanup fund established in 75-11-313.
(3) The department may not limit the use of money from the petroleum tank release cleanup fund
established in 75-11-313 when used as a commitment to a federal brownfields loan to an eligible entity for
remediation of petroleum at a brownfield site.
(4) (a) Except as provided in subsection (4)(b), a determination made by the department or the
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 808
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 808
United States environmental protection agency that a brownfield site is eligible for federal brownfields funding
does not limit or alter the responsible party's, owner's, or operator's responsibility to assess or remediate:
(i) a petroleum or hazardous substance release in accordance with Title 75, chapter 11; or
(ii) a liability at a facility subject to the Comprehensive Environmental Cleanup and Responsibility
Act in accordance with Title 75, chapter 10.
(b) The department shall approve a comprehensive remediation plan and allow for the use of
federal brownfields funding at the brownfield site if
the department determines that an eligible entity has proposed to conduct timely and comprehensive
environmental remediation activities using federal brownfields funding at a brownfield site that:
(i) is eligible for brownfield funding as determined by the department or U.S. environmental
protection agency;
(ii) proposes a remediation plan of environmental remediation activities that meets or exceeds
department remediation standards; and
(iii) meets or exceeds financial commitments required by the petroleum tank release compensation
board pursuant to Title 75, chapter 11, part 3.
Section 6. Site access. Upon presentation of the proper credentials, an authorized representative of
the department may enter any building, property, premises, place, or facility where brownfield redevelopment or
environmental remediation activities are being performed or have been performed for the purpose of making an
inspection to ensure compliance by any person pursuant to the provisions of [sections 1 through 8] or rules
promulgated pursuant to [sections 1 through 8].
Section 7. Rulemaking authority. The department may adopt rules to implement the provisions of
[sections 1 through 8] and to:
(1) prescribe the form and content of applications for assistance from the brownfields site
redevelopment fund;
(2) apply eligibility criteria for awarding assistance from the brownfields site redevelopment fund;
(3) establish additional terms and conditions for assistance from the brownfields site
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 808
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 808
redevelopment fund;
(4) establish maximum amounts for an individual award of assistance from the brownfields site
redevelopment fund, if considered appropriate and necessary for the successful administration of the program;
(5) ensure compliance of the program with the provisions of the Small Business Liability Relief and
Brownfields Revitalization Act, Public Law 107-118, and rules promulgated under the act unless these matters
are specifically governed by [sections 8]; and
(6) maintain the financial integrity of the program.
Section 8. Brownfields site redevelopment fund -- statutory appropriation. (1) It is the intent of
the brownfield program to strengthen communities throughout this state and to promote economic development
by encouraging environmental remediation activities and brownfields redevelopment of properties blighted by
real or perceived contamination.
(2) The brownfields site redevelopment fund is an account in the state special revenue fund for
assessment and cleanup of brownfield sites.
(3) The money in the account:
(a) may be deposited through an allocation of money.
(b) must be deposited through money received by the department in the form of legislative
appropriations, reimbursements, gifts, or donations from any source that is intended to be used for the
purposes of this account.
(4) The money in the account is statutorily appropriated, as provided in 17-7-502, to the
department to be used only for:
(a) investigation and cleanup of petroleum or hazardous substances on an eligible site or facility
for the purposes of brownfields redevelopment;
(b) demolition of structures, buildings, or other improvements located on an eligible site or facility;
(c) interior contaminant abatement activities on an eligible site or facility for asbestos abatement
activities, as described in 75-2-502, or lead-based paint abatement activities as described in 40 CFR, part 745,
subpart E; or
(d) removal of underground tank systems.
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 808
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 808
(5) Any unspent or unencumbered money in the account at the end of a fiscal year must remain in
the account.
(6) Interest income on the account must deposited and remain in the account.
Section 9. Section 17-7-502, MCA, is amended to read:
"17-7-502. Statutory appropriations -- definition -- requisites for validity. (1) A statutory
appropriation is an appropriation made by permanent law that authorizes spending by a state agency without
the need for a biennial legislative appropriation or budget amendment.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4), to be effective, a statutory appropriation must comply with
both of the following provisions:
(a) The law containing the statutory authority must be listed in subsection (3).
(b) The law or portion of the law making a statutory appropriation must specifically state that a
statutory appropriation is made as provided in this section.
(3) The following laws are the only laws containing statutory appropriations: 2-17-105; 5-11-120; 5-
11-407; 5-13-403; 5-13-404; 7-4-2502; 7-4-2924; 7-32-236; 10-1-108; 10-1-1202; 10-1-1303; 10-2-603; 10-2-
807; 10-3-203; 10-3-310; 10-3-312; 10-3-314; 10-3-316; 10-3-802; 10-3-1304; 10-4-304; 10-4-310; 15-1-121;
15-1-142; 15-1-143; 15-1-218; 15-1-2302; 15-31-165; 15-31-1004; 15-31-1005; 15-35-108; 15-36-332; 15-37-
117; 15-39-110; 15-65-121; 15-70-128; 15-70-131; 15-70-132; 15-70-433; 16-11-119; 16-11-509; 17-3-106; 17-
3-212; 17-3-222; 17-3-241; 17-6-101; 17-6-214; 17-7-133; 17-7-215; 18-11-112; 19-3-319; 19-3-320; 19-6-410;
19-9-702; 19-13-604; 19-17-301; 19-18-512; 19-19-305; 19-19-506; 19-20-604; 19-20-607; 19-21-203; 20-3-
369; 20-7-1709; 20-8-107; 20-9-250; 20-9-534; 20-9-622; [ 20-15-328]; 20-26-617; 20-26-1503; 22-1-327; 22-3-
116; 22-3-117; [ 22-3-1004]; 23-4-105; 23-5-306; 23-5-409; 23-5-612; 23-7-301; 23-7-402; 30-10-1004; 37-43-
204; 37-50-209; 37-54-113; 39-71-503; 41-5-2011; 42-2-105; 44-4-1101; 44-4-1506; 44-12-213; 44-13-102; 50-
1-115; 53-1-109; 53-6-148; 53-9-113; 53-24-108; 53-24-206; 60-5-530; 60-11-115; 61-3-321; 61-3-415; 67-1-
309; 69-3-870; 69-4-527; 75-1-1101; 75-5-1108; 75-6-214; 75-11-313; [section 8]; 75-26-308; 76-13-150; 76-
13-151; 76-13-417; 76-17-103; 77-1-108; 77-2-362; 80-2-222; 80-4-416; 80-11-518; 80-11-1006; 81-1-112; 81-
1-113; 81-2-203; 81-7-106; 81-7-123; 81-10-103; 82-11-161; 85-20-1504; 85-20-1505; [ 85-25-102]; 87-1-603;
87-5-909; 90-1-115; 90-1-205; 90-1-504; 90-6-331; and 90-9-306.
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – HB 808
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 808
(4) There is a statutory appropriation to pay the principal, interest, premiums, and any costs or fees
associated with issuing, paying, securing, redeeming, or defeasing all bonds, notes, or other obligations, as due
in the ordinary course or when earlier called for redemption or defeased, that have been authorized and issued
pursuant to the laws of Montana. Agencies that have entered into agreements authorized by the laws of
Montana to pay the state treasurer, for deposit in accordance with 17-2-101 through 17-2-107, as determined
by the state treasurer, an amount sufficient to pay the principal and interest as due on the bonds or notes have
statutory appropriation authority for the payments. (In subsection (3): pursuant to sec. 10, Ch. 360, L. 1999, the
inclusion of 19-20-604 terminates contingently when the amortization period for the teachers' retirement
system's unfunded liability is 10 years or less; pursuant to sec. 73, Ch. 44, L. 2007, the inclusion of 19-6-410
terminates contingently upon the death of the last recipient eligible under 19-6-709(2) for the supplemental
benefit provided by 19-6-709; pursuant to sec. 5, Ch. 383, L. 2015, the inclusion of 85-25-102 is effective on
occurrence of contingency; pursuant to sec. 6, Ch. 423, L. 2015, the inclusion of 22-3-116 and 22-3-117
terminates June 30, 2025; pursuant to sec. 4, Ch. 122, L. 2017, the inclusion of 10-3-1304 terminates
September 30, 2025; pursuant to sec. 1, Ch. 213, L. 2017, the inclusion of 90-6-331 terminates June 30, 2027;
pursuant to sec. 10, Ch. 374, L. 2017, the inclusion of 76-17-103 terminates June 30, 2027; pursuant to secs.
11, 12, and 14, Ch. 343, L. 2019, the inclusion of 15-35-108 terminates June 30, 2027; pursuant to sec. 1, Ch.
408, L. 2019, the inclusion of 17-7-215 terminates June 30, 2029; pursuant to secs. 1, 2, 3, Ch. 139, L. 2021,
the inclusion of 53-9-113 terminates June 30, 2027; pursuant to sec. 8, Ch. 200, L. 2021, the inclusion of 10-4-
310 terminates July 1, 2031; pursuant to secs. 3, 4, Ch. 404, L. 2021, the inclusion of 30-10-1004 terminates
June 30, 2027; pursuant to sec. 5, Ch. 548, L. 2021, the inclusion of 50-1-115 terminates June 30, 2025;
pursuant to secs. 5 and 12, Ch. 563, L. 2021, the inclusion of 22-3-1004 is effective July 1, 2027; pursuant to
sec. 1, Ch. 20, L. 2023, sec. 2, Ch. 20, L. 2023, and sec. 3, Ch. 20, L. 2023, the inclusion of 81-1-112, 81-1-
113, and 81-7-106 terminates June 30, 2029; pursuant to sec. 9, Ch. 44, L. 2023, the inclusion of 15-1-142
terminates December 31, 2025; pursuant to sec. 10, Ch. 47, L. 2023, the inclusion of 15-1-2302 terminates
June 30, 2025; pursuant to sec. 2, Ch. 374, L. 2023, the inclusion of 10-3-802 terminates June 30, 2031;
pursuant to sec. 12, Ch. 558, L. 2023, the inclusion of 20-9-250 terminates December 31, 2029; pursuant to
sec. 4, Ch. 621, L. 2023, the inclusion of 22-1-327 terminates July 1, 2029; pursuant to sec. 24, Ch. 722, L.
2023, the inclusion of 17-7-133 terminates June 30, 2027; pursuant to sec. 10, Ch. 758, L. 2023, the inclusion
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – HB 808
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 808
of 44-4-1506 terminates June 30, 2027; and pursuant to sec. 10, Ch. 764, L. 2023, the inclusion of 15-1-143
terminates December 31, 2025.)"
Section 10. Section 75-11-309, MCA, is amended to read:
"75-11-309. Procedures for reimbursement of eligible costs -- corrective action plans. (1) An
owner or operator seeking reimbursement for eligible costs and the department shall comply with the following
procedures:
(a) If an owner or operator discovers or is provided evidence that a release may have occurred
from the owner's or operator's petroleum storage tank, the owner or operator shall immediately notify the
department of the release and conduct an initial response to the release in accordance with state and federal
laws and rules to protect the public health and safety and the environment.
(b) Except for a tank for which a permit is sought under 75-11-308(1)(b)(iii) and that is closed
within 120 days of discovery of the release, following discovery of the release, the petroleum storage tank must
remain in compliance with applicable state and federal laws and rules that the board determines pertain to
prevention and mitigation of petroleum releases.
(c) The owner or operator shall conduct a thorough investigation of the release and, subject to
subsection (1)(d), report the findings to the department, and, as determined necessary by the department,
prepare and submit for approval by the department a corrective action plan that conforms with state, tribal
(when applicable), and federal corrective action requirements.
(d) For a release in which the costs are expected to exceed $100,000, an owner or operator, a
representative of the owner or operator, the department, the board, and board staff shall meet to discuss the
response to the release. For a release in which the costs are expected to be less than $100,000, an owner or
operator, a representative of the owner or operator, the department, the board, and board staff may meet to
discuss the response to the release if any party requests a meeting.
(e) (i) The department shall review the corrective action plan and forward a copy to a local
government office, the board, and, when applicable, a tribal government office with jurisdiction over a corrective
action for the release. The local or tribal government office and the board shall inform the department if it wants
any modification of the proposed plan.
- 9 - Authorized Print Version – HB 808
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 808
(ii) Based on its own review and comments received from a local government, a tribal government,
the board, or other source, the department, subject to 75-11-408(4)(b) [section 5(4)(b)], may approve the
proposed corrective action plan, make or request the owner or operator to modify the proposed plan, or prepare
its own plan for compliance by the owner or operator. A plan finally approved by the department through any
process provided in this subsection (1)(d) is the approved corrective action plan.
(iii) After the department approves a corrective action plan, a local government, or a tribal
government, or the board may not impose different corrective action requirements on the owner or operator.
(f) A corrective action plan prepared by the owner, operator, or department for any petroleum
storage tank release may include the establishment of a petroleum mixing zone as defined in 75-11-503.
(g) The department shall notify the owner or operator of its approval of a corrective action plan and
shall promptly submit a copy of the approved corrective action plan to the board.
(h) The owner or operator shall implement the corrective action plan or plans approved by the
department until the release is resolved. The department may oversee the implementation of the plan, require
reports and monitoring from the owner or operator, undertake inspections, and otherwise exercise its authority
concerning corrective action under Title 75, chapter 10, part 7, Title 75, chapter 11, part 5, and other applicable
law and rules.
(i) (i) The owner or operator shall document in the manner required by the board all expenses
incurred in preparing and implementing the corrective action plan. The owner or operator shall submit claims
and substantiating documents to the board in the form and manner required by the board.
(ii) The board shall review each claim and determine if the claims are actual, reasonable, and
necessary costs of responding to the release and implementing the corrective action plan.
(iii) If the board requires additional information to determine if a claimed cost is actual, reasonable,
and necessary, the board may request comment from the department and the owner or operator.
(iv) If the department determines that an owner or operator is failing to properly implement a
corrective action plan, it shall notify the board.
(j) The owner or operator shall document, in the manner required by the board, any payments to a
third party for bodily injury or property damage caused by a release. The owner or operator shall submit claims
and substantiating documents to the board in the form and manner required by the board.
- 10 - Authorized Print Version – HB 808
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 808
(k) In addition to the documentation in subsections (1)(i) and (1)(j), when the release is claimed to
have originated from a properly designed and installed double-walled tank system, the owner or operator shall
document, in the manner required by the board, the following:
(i) the date that the release was discovered; and
(ii) that the originating tank was part of a properly designed and installed double-walled tank
system.
(2) If an owner or operator is issued an administrative order for failure to comply with requirements
imposed by or pursuant to Title 75, chapter 11, part 5, or rules adopted pursuant to Title 75, chapter 11, part 5,
all reimbursement of claims submitted after the date of the order must be suspended. Upon a written
determination by the department that the owner or operator has returned to compliance with the requirements
of Title 75, chapter 11, part 5, or rules adopted pursuant to Title 75, chapter 11, part 5, suspended and future
claims may be reimbursed according to criteria established by the board. In establishing the criteria, the board
shall consider the effect and duration of the noncompliance.
(3) The board shall review each claim received under subsections (1)(i) and (1)(j), make the
determination required by this subsection, inform the owner or operator of its determination, and, as
appropriate, reimburse the owner or operator from the fund. Before approving a reimbursement, the board shall
affirmatively determine that:
(a) the expenses for which reimbursement is claimed:
(i) are eligible costs; and
(ii) were actually, necessarily, and reasonably incurred for the preparation or implementation of a
corrective action plan approved by the department or for payments to a third party for bodily injury or property
damage; and
(b) the owner or operator:
(i) is eligible for reimbursement under 75-11-308; and
(ii) has complied with this section and any rules adopted pursuant to this section. Upon a
determination by the board that the owner or operator has not complied with this section or rules adopted
pursuant to this section, all reimbursement of pending and future claims must be suspended. Upon a
determination by the board that the owner or operator has returned to compliance with this section or rules
- 11 - Authorized Print Version – HB 808
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 808
adopted pursuant to this section, suspended and future claims may be reimbursed according to criteria
established by the board. In establishing the criteria, the board shall consider the effect and duration of the
noncompliance.
(4) (a) If an owner or operator disagrees with a board determination under subsection (3), the
owner or operator may submit a written request for a hearing before the board.
(b) A written request for a hearing must be received by the board within 120 days after notice of
the board's determination is served on the owner or operator by certified mail. The notice of determination must
advise the owner or operator of the 120-day time limit for submitting a written request for a hearing to the board.
Not less than 50 days or more than 60 days after the board serves the notice of determination, the board shall
serve on the owner or operator a second notice by certified mail advising the owner or operator of the deadline
for requesting a hearing. Service by certified mail is complete on the date shown on the certified mail receipt.
(c) If a written request is received within 120 days, the hearing must be held at a meeting of the
board or as otherwise permitted under the Montana Administrative Procedure Act no later than 120 days
following receipt of the request or at a time mutually agreed to by the board and the owner or operator.
(d) If a written request is not received within 120 days, the determination of the board is final.
(5) The board shall obligate money for reimbursement of eligible costs of owners and operators in
the order that the costs are finally approved by the board.
(6) (a) The board may, at the request of an owner or operator, guarantee in writing the
reimbursement of eligible costs that have been approved by the board but for which money is not currently
available from the fund for reimbursement.
(b) The board may, at the request of an owner or operator, guarantee in writing reimbursement of
eligible costs not yet approved by the board, including estimated costs not yet incurred. A guarantee for
payment under this subsection (6)(b) does not affect the order in which money in the fund is obligated under
subsection (5).
(c) When considering a request for a guarantee of payment, the board may require pertinent
information or documentation from the owner or operator. The board may grant or deny, in whole or in part, any
request for a guarantee."
- 12 - Authorized Print Version – HB 808
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 808
Section 11. Repealer. The following sections of the Montana Code Annotated are repealed:
75-11-401. Short title.
75-11-402. Findings and intent -- purposes.
75-11-403. Definitions -- application.
75-11-407. Viability.
75-11-408. Brownfields site eligibility at petroleum tank release sites -- determinations and limitations.
75-11-409. Use of petroleum brownfields funding acquired by state -- limitations.
Section 12. Notification to tribal governments. The secretary of state shall send a copy of [this act]
to each federally recognized tribal government in Montana.
Section 13. Transfer of funds. The state treasurer shall transfer the following amounts from the
general fund to the brownfields site redevelopment fund provided for in [section 8]:
Fiscal year 2026 $200,000
Fiscal year 2027 $200,000
Section 14. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 8] are intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 75, chapter 11, and the provisions of Title 75, chapter 11, apply to [sections 1 through 8].
- END -
- 13 - Authorized Print Version – HB 808
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 808, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 808
INTRODUCED BY P. TUSS
AN ACT PROVIDING FOR THE MONTANA BROWNFIELDS REVITALIZATION ACT; PROVIDING
DEFINITIONS; AUTHORIZING THE MONTANA BROWNFIELDS FUND; PROVIDING FOR BROWNFIELD
REDEVELOPMENT VIABILITY AND ELIGIBILITY; PROVIDING RULEMAKING AUTHORITY; ELIMINATING
THE MONTANA PETROLEUM BROWNFIELDS REVITALIZATION ACT; PROVIDING FOR A TRANSFER OF
GENERAL FUNDS; PROVIDING A STATUTORY APPROPRIATION; AMENDING SECTIONS 17-7-502 AND
75-11-309, MCA; AND REPEALING SECTIONS 75-11-401, 75-11-402, 75-11-403, 75-11-407, 75-11-408, AND
75-11-409, MCA.”